Maine, session 132, LD1919.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §2261, sub-§6, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 639, §1,
is amended to read:
6. Eligible criminal conviction. "Eligible criminal conviction" means:
A. A conviction for a current or former Class E crime, except a conviction for a current
or former Class E crime under Title 17‑A, chapter 11; and
B. A conviction for a crime when the crime was committed prior to January 30, 2017
for:
(1) Aggravated trafficking, furnishing or cultivation of scheduled drugs under
Title 17‑A, former section 1105 when the person was convicted of cultivating
scheduled drugs, the scheduled drug was marijuana and the crime committed was
a Class D crime;
(2) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17‑A, section 1105‑D,
subsection 1, paragraph A, subparagraph (4);
(3) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17‑A, section 1105‑D,
subsection 1, paragraph B‑1, subparagraph (4);
(4) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17‑A, section 1105‑D,
subsection 1, paragraph D, subparagraph (4); and
(5) Unlawful possession of a scheduled drug under Title 17‑A, former section
1107 when that drug was marijuana and the underlying crime was a Class D crime.;
C. A conviction for unlawful possession of a scheduled drug under Title 17-A, section
1107-A or Title 17-A, former section 1107;
D. A conviction for a crime under Title 17-A, chapter 45, except for a conviction for
a Class A crime under Title 17-A, section 1105-A or a conviction for a crime that
involved the use of a firearm; and
E. A conviction for a current or former Class D crime, except:
(1) A conviction for a current or former Class D crime under Title 17‑A, chapter
11 or 12;
(2) A conviction for violation of condition of release under section 1092
committed while the defendant was on preconviction or post-conviction bail for a
crime under Title 17-A, chapter 11 or 12;
(3) A conviction for a current or former Class D crime under Title 17-A, section
852, 853 or 855;
(4) A conviction for assault under Title 17-A, section 207 if the defendant was or
could have been charged with a crime under Title 17-A, chapter 11 or 12 arising
out of the same course of conduct;
(5) A conviction for stalking under Title 17-A, section 210-A or 210-C;
(6) Unless a sentence has been commuted, any conviction involving a crime of
domestic violence or any crime involving domestic violence, as defined in section
1003, subsection 3-A;
Page 1 - 132LR2458(01)

(7) A violation of a protective order, as specified in section 321, subsection 6; Title
5, section 4659, subsection 2; Title 17-A, section 506-B; Title 19-A, former section
4011, subsection 3; Title 19-A, former section 4012, subsection 5; or Title 19-A,
section 4113, subsection 1;
(8) A conviction for cruelty to animals under Title 17, section 1031;
(9) A conviction for a crime against a family or household member, as defined in
Title 19-A, section 4102, subsection 6 or Title 19-A, former section 4002,
subsection 4, regardless of whether the relationship was an element of that crime,
if 20 years have passed since the judgment of conviction was entered; or
(10) A conviction for the crime of violation of a condition of release, pursuant to
section 1092, committed while the defendant is released on preconviction or
post-conviction bail for a charge that involves a crime against a family or
household member, as defined in Title 19-A, section 4102, subsection 6 or Title
19-A, former section 4002, subsection 4, regardless of whether the relationship was
an element of that crime, if 20 years have passed since the judgment of conviction
was entered.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §2262, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 409, §1, is further
amended to read:
Except as provided in section 2262‑A, criminal history record information relating to
a one or more specific criminal conviction convictions may be sealed under this chapter
only if:
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §2262-A, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 409, §2, is amended
to read:
Criminal history record information relating to a one or more specific criminal
conviction convictions for engaging in prostitution under Title 17‑A, former section 853-A
must be sealed under this chapter if:
Sec. 4. 15 MRSA §2263, as amended by PL 2023, c. 409, §3, is further amended to
read:
§2263. Motion; persons who may file
A person may file a written motion seeking a court order sealing the person's criminal
history record information relating to a one or more specific criminal conviction
convictions in the underlying criminal proceeding based on a court determination that the
person satisfies the statutory prerequisites specified in section 2262 or 2262‑A. The written
motion must briefly address each of the statutory prerequisites.